Louisiana, session 2026, HB312.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The following sums are hereby appropriated from the sources specified
for the purpose of making supplemental appropriations for Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
01-100 EXECUTIVE OFFICE
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Administrative
Program for a study to expand access to early care $ 43,300
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Coastal Protection
and Restoration Authority to the Administrative
Program for coastal protection policy coordination
and production of the Annual Coastal Protection
and Restoration Plan $ 500,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administrative Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($1,700,000).
01-103 MENTAL HEALTH ADVOCACY SERVICE
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Department of
Children and Family Services to the Administrative
Program for Title IV-E services $ 500,000
Page 1 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
01-107 DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATION
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Political
Subdivision Federal Grant Assistance Fund
to the Executive Administration Program for the
Louisiana Infrastructure Technical Assistance
Corporation $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Executive Administration Program for
modernization of permit systems $ 5,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Community Development Block Grant Program, as contained in Act No.
1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Phase II Subfund of the Water Sector
Fund by ($40,000,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Community Development Block Grant
Program for the Louisiana Housing Corporation for
quality of life, neighborhood stabilization efforts,
housing efforts, and crime prevention efforts in
New Orleans $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Community Development Block Grant
Program for the Blue Tarp Program $ 135,000
01-111GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY
PREPAREDNESS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for closeout costs
due in 2026 associated with Hurricane Rita,
Hurricane Isaac, severe storms and flooding
events, Hurricane Barry, COVID-19, and
Hurricane Ida $ 3,505,538
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for the state
cost share for amounts due in 2026 for
Hurricane Francine and the 2026 Winter Storm $ 1,486,897
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for a contract
for governance of the Intelligence Coordination
Center (ICC) $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for the
relocation of the Vermilion Parish LWIN tower $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for new
acquisitions for the Louisiana Wireless
Information Network (LWIN) $ 175,000
Page 2 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
01-112 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Military Affairs Program for state cost share
for the January 2026 winter storms $ 62,500
EXPENDITURES:
Military Affairs Program for acquisitions and
equipment including a vacuum truck, a towable
woodchipper, tracked mini-excavators, and a tractor
with attachments $ 649,497
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 649,497
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 149,497
Federal Funds $ 500,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 649,497
EXPENDITURES:
Education Program for acquisitions, equipment,
and building projects $ 83,109
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 83,109
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 18,027
Federal Funds $ 65,082
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 83,109
EXPENDITURES:
Military Affairs Program for master planning
for Lake Charles and Baton Rouge Armed Forces
Reserve Center $ 300,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 300,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 84,000
Federal Funds $ 216,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Education Program
for operations $ 90,504
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Education Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds by ($90,504).
01-116 OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Office of the State Public Defender Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Overcollections Fund by ($2,491,105).
Page 3 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
01-124 LOUISIANA STADIUM AND EXPOSITION DISTRICT
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Sports Facility
Assistance Fund to the Administrative Program
for contractual obligations $ 469,930
01-129 LOUISIANA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND THE
ADMINISTRATION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the State Program for perpetual licenses and
implementation costs for the Louisiana Center
for Safe Schools in the event that House Bill
No. 821 of the 2026 Regular Session of the
Louisiana Legislature becomes law $ 15,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco Tax
Health Care Fund to the State Program $ 335,958
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the State Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($892,093).
01-254 LOUISIANA STATE RACING COMMISSION
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Video Draw Poker
Device Purse Supplement Subfund to the Louisiana
State Racing Commission Program for horse racing
activities $ 2,198,716
SCHEDULE 03
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
03-130 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Contact Assistance Program for funding
for Louisiana National Guard disability benefit
claims $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for office of
technology services expenses $ 14,234
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Contact Assistance Program for personal
services and operating expenses $ 646,043
03-131 LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Louisiana
Veterans Home Program for acquisitions and
major repairs $ 207,000
Page 4 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
03-135 NORTHWEST LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Northwest
Louisiana Veterans Home Program for
personal services $ 363,793
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Northwest
Louisiana Veterans Home Program for
acquisitions and major repairs $ 159,815

SCHEDULE 04
ELECTED OFFICIALS
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
04-139 SECRETARY OF STATE
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Elections Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by
($12,760,000).
OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
04-146 LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for the America 250
Commission $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for festival support
in Lafourche Parish $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for local events and
festivals $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for the Cedar Grove
Annexation Celebration $ 100,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY
04-160 AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Forestry Program for equipment and
acquisitions $ 10,680,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for rice
marketing $ 5,000,000
Page 5 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
SCHEDULE 05
LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
05-250 OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Economic
Development Program for the Louisiana Ports
Complex $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Economic Development Program for the
Louisiana Talent Opportunity initiative $ 5,000,000
SCHEDULE 06
DEPARTMENT OF CULTURE, RECREATION AND TOURISM
06-263 OFFICE OF STATE MUSEUM
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Museum Program for major repairs at the
Wedell-Williams Memorial Aviation Museum and
the Cypress Sawmill Museum $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Museum Program for acquisitions and major
repairs at the Cabildo and Presbytere Museums $ 1,500,000
06-264 OFFICE OF STATE PARKS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parks and Recreation Program for acquisitions $ 3,008,751
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parks and Recreation Program for the Sam
Houston Jones State Park for trail maintenance $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parks and Recreation Program for Ouiski
Bayou State Park $ 500,000
06-265 OFFICE OF CULTURAL DEVELOPMENT
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Cultural
Development Program for personal services in
connection with a National Park Service grant $ 150,000
06-267 OFFICE OF TOURISM
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for
New Orleans & Company for economic
impact growth in New Orleans $ 250,000
Page 6 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
SCHEDULE 07
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND DEVELOPMENT
07-276 ENGINEERING AND OPERATIONS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Operations for acquisitions and
equipment for machines to assist with ice storms $ 800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Operations for a ferry fuel
efficiency study $ 1,800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Operations Program for LA 341
Drainage in St. Martin Parish $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operations Program for rural regional
planning activities with regional entities, to be
evenly split between Planning Districts 7 and 4 $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Operations Program for State
Highway District 3 for asphalt overlay and related
work on LA 751 from LA 752 to LA 35, or other
routes in Acadia and St. Landry Parish $ 700,000
SCHEDULE 08
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONS
CORRECTIONS SERVICES
08-400 CORRECTIONS–ADMINISTRATION
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Management and Finance for the
CIPRIS Offender Management System $ 5,871,200
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Office of the Secretary, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($335,095).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Adult Services Program for offender medical
expenditures, personal services, and other
compensation $ 9,380,419
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Board of Pardons and Parole for personal
services and other compensation $ 273,965
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Adult Services Program for offender
medical expenditures $ 7,987,729
Page 7 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
08-402 LOUISIANA STATE PENITENTIARY
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for operating
expenses $ 607,630
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services,
other compensation, and supplies $ 12,325,118
08-405 RAYMOND LABORDE CORRECTIONAL CENTER
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for supplies and other
compensation $ 586,350
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($277,313).
08-406 LOUISIANA CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTE FOR WOMEN
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for personal services,
other compensation, and operating expenses $ 646,062
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services $ 629,037
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for anti-recidivism
and workforce training $ 10,000
08-407 WINN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Purchase of Correctional Services Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($218,521).
08-408 ALLEN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($651,660).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services $ 651,660
08-409 DIXON CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for personal services,
other compensation, and operating expenses $ 363,403
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services,
other compensation, and operating expenses $ 1,289,549
Page 8 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
08-413 ELAYN HUNT CORRECTIONAL CENTER
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for operating
expenses $ 189,728
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services
and supplies $ 3,324,648
08-414 DAVID WADE CORRECTIONAL CENTER
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Program for operating
expenses $ 322,189
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services
and supplies $ 1,438,997
08-415 ADULT PROBATION AND PAROLE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration and Support Program for
personal services $ 78,324
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Field Services Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($4,809,517).
08-416 B. B. "SIXTY" RAYBURN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
(Direct) by ($14,822).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for personal services,
other compensation, and supplies $ 1,505,665

PUBLIC SAFETY SERVICES
08-418 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND FINANCE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
payment card industry data security standard
compliance and required GAAP analysis $ 47,600
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
information technology modernization $ 539,173
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
operating expenses and major repairs at the
Department of Public Safety campus $ 2,611,574
Page 9 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
08-419 OFFICE OF STATE POLICE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for costs
associated with moving into the new State Police
Crime Lab $ 9,601,698
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for the Fusion
Center for a review with the Governor's Office of
Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness
to mitigate potential attacks on Louisiana $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Traffic Enforcement Program for winter
weather expenses $ 1,438,734
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Office of Motor
Vehicles Driver's License Escrow Dedicated Fund
Account to the Traffic Enforcement Program to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference forecast $ 4,127,747
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Traffic Enforcement Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund by
($4,127,747).
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Office of Motor
Vehicles Driver's License Escrow Dedicated Fund
Account to the Operational Support Program for
Aircraft Services expenses $ 625,744
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Office of Motor
Vehicles Driver's License Escrow Dedicated Fund
Account to the Operational Support Program for
acquisitions $ 1,297,338
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Office of Motor
Vehicles Driver's License Escrow Dedicated Fund
Account to the Gaming Enforcement Program for
the purchase of a cloud-based licensing system $ 1,189,240
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Operational Support Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund (Direct) by ($4,352,196).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for the North
Louisiana Criminalistics Laboratory $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for the
Troopers and Employees Assistance Program for
mental health services for troopers $ 100,000
Page 10 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Riverboat
Gaming Enforcement Fund to the Traffic
Enforcement Program $ 4,337,997
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Traffic Enforcement Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($4,337,997).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco Tax
Health Care Fund to the Operational Support
Program $ 671,919
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Operational Support Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($671,919).
08-420 OFFICE OF MOTOR VEHICLES
EXPENDITURES:
Licensing Program for Office of Technology Services
expenditures $ 1,805,650
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,805,650
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 392,891
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,412,759
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 1,805,650
08-422 OFFICE OF STATE FIRE MARSHAL
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Fire Prevention Program for improvements
to the training facility $ 5,000,000
08-424 LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS COMMISSION
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Liquefied
Petroleum Gas Commission Rainy Day Dedicated
Fund Account to the Administrative Program for
Phase 1 of a web-based permit system $ 250,000
YOUTH SERVICES
08-403 OFFICE OF JUVENILE JUSTICE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Youth Services Program for security
acquisitions $ 1,753,266
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Youth Services Program for the Louisiana
Multi-Agency Resource Center for after school and
summertime programming $ 70,000
Page 11 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
09-301FLORIDA PARISHES HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
Payable out of Federal Funds for
carryforward funds from the federal
Certified Community Behavioral Health
Clinic grant $ 284,402
09-305 MEDICAL VENDOR ADMINISTRATION
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Medical
Vendor Administration Program for
implementation of the state's Medicaid Community
Engagement requirements and other necessary
eligibility system requirements $ 3,974,505
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Medical
Vendor Administration Program for screening
expenses $ 218,500
EXPENDITURES:
Medical Vendor Administration
for the eligibility contract $ 23,938,200
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 23,938,200
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 11,969,100
Federal Funds $ 11,969,100
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 23,938,200
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Medical Vendor Administration Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($5,000,000).
09-306 MEDICAL VENDOR PAYMENTS
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($18,307,385).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Fees and Self-generated Revenues by ($16,683,382).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Medical Assistance Trust Fund
by ($39,217,416).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
Page 12 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Hospital Stabilization Fund by
($35,464,307).

The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds
by ($351,720,908).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($15,342).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds
by ($32,437).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Medicare Buy-Ins & Supplements Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($16,260,363).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Medicare Buy-Ins & Supplements Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal
Funds by ($17,067,546).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Interagency Transfers by ($1,105,064).
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Payments to Private
Providers Program for premiums $ 1,105,064
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Payments to
Public Providers Program for school-based services
cost settlements $ 45,794,523
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Payments to Private Providers Program $ 1,791,584
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the
means of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No.
1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Fund by ($1,791,584).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Health
Excellence Fund to the Payments to Private
Providers Program $ 17,643,543
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($17,643,543).
Page 13 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Medical Assistance Trust Fund to the Payments
to Private Providers Program $ 4,062,972
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($4,062,972).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Uncompensated Care Costs Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($1,466,952).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Uncompensated Care Costs Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds
by ($3,093,048).
09-307 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Management and
Finance Program for the Health Standards Section $ 1,205,689
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Management and Finance Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds by
($1,205,689).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Management and Finance Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Health Care Employment Reinvestment
Opportunity Fund by ($11,684,809).
09-320 OFFICE OF AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
EXPENDITURES:
Administration Protection and Support
Program for screening expenses $ 480,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 480,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 360,000
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 120,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 480,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Administration
Protection and Support Program for the Health
Standards section $ 141,500
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Protection and Support Program, as contained in Act No.
1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Interagency Transfers by ($141,500).
Page 14 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Administration
Protection and Support Program for conference
room conversion $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Villa Feliciana
Medical Complex Program for acquisitions and
major repairs $ 1,548,928
09-324 LOUISIANA EMERGENCY RESPONSE NETWORK
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers for equipment for the
LERN Communication Center and education
and outreach activities $ 30,391
09-330 OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Hospital Based
Treatment Program for the acquisition of an
electronic health record system $ 15,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco
Tax Health Care Fund to the Behavioral Health
Administration and Community Oversight Program $ 335,958
09-340 OFFICE FOR CITIZENS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Pinecrest Supports
and Services Center for operating services,
major repairs, supplies, salaries, and professional
services $ 4,051,566
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Central
Louisiana Supports and Services Center
for the acquisition of an emergency plant
generator $ 1,693,374
09-350 OFFICE ON WOMEN'S HEALTH AND COMMUNITY HEALTH
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the
means of finance for the Office on Women's Health and Community Health, as contained
in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the
appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by ($291,454).
SCHEDULE 10
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
10-360 OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Division of Management and Finance for
operating expenses $ 3,984,187
Page 15 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Division of Child Welfare for guardianship
services, evaluations, and foster care $ 3,243,079
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Division of Family Support Program for
operating expenses $ 9,756,521
SCHEDULE 11
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
11-431 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Executive Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Coastal Resources Trust Dedicated Fund Account by
($2,600,000).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Executive Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by
($7,000,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Executive Program for acquisitions
and professional services $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Mineral and
Energy Operation Fund to the Executive
Program for support of the Sparta
Groundwater Commission $ 145,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Executive Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by
($2,400,000).
SCHEDULE 13
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
13-856 OFFICE OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Office of Environmental Assessment Program, as contained in Act No. 1
of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the Environmental Trust
Dedicated Fund Account by ($500,000).
SCHEDULE 14
LOUISIANA WORKS
14-474 WORKFORCE SUPPORT AND TRAINING
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Management and Finance for
major repairs $ 201,003
Page 16 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from Louisiana Economic
Development to the Office of Workforce
Development for the Talent Opportunity Campaign $ 2,000,000
SCHEDULE 16
DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE AND FISHERIES
16-511 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND FINANCE
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
system upgrades within the department $ 4,400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Outdoors
Forever Fund to the Office of Management and
Finance for outdoor conservation projects $ 1,000,000
16-512 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Wildlife
Habitat and Natural Heritage Trust Fund to
the Administrative Program for legal
professional services $ 500,000
16-514 OFFICE OF FISHERIES
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Oyster
Development Fund to the Fisheries Program for
Oyster Task Force promotional activities and
a consulting services contract to develop an oyster
species identification and anti-substitution
protocol $ 42,000
SCHEDULE 18
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
In accordance with Article VII, Section 10(D)(2)(b)(iii) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
Legislature of Louisiana hereby adopts the following distribution formula for fiscal year
2024-2025 nonrecurring revenues: All such monies shall be distributed pro rata to any state
retirement system that meets all of the following criteria according to the system's most
recent valuation adopted by the Public Retirement Systems' Actuarial Committee:
(A) Has an outstanding amortization base for the system's unfunded accrued liability
existing as of June 30, 1988.
(B) Has a funded ratio of less than eighty percent.
In order to maximize the return to the state fisc, any state retirement system receiving
monies from this distribution shall revise its actuarial calculation of employer contributions
rates for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year accordingly. A valuation with a revised actuarially
required employer contribution rate for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year shall be submitted to the
Public Retirement Systems' Actuarial Committee within three days of the valuation's
adoption by the system's board of trustees.
Page 17 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
18-585 LOUISIANA STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM -
CONTRIBUTIONS
EXPENDITURES:
To the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement
System $ 144,268,468
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 144,268,468
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) from the FY 2024-2025
surplus certified by the commissioner of
administration at the January 23, 2026, meeting of
the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget and
recognized by the Revenue Estimating Conference $ 144,268,468
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 144,268,468
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Unfunded
Accrued Liability Fund to the Louisiana State
Employees' Retirement System for application to
the balance of the unfunded accrued liability of the
system existing as of June 30, 1988 $ 1,175,515
18-586 TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF LOUISIANA
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Unfunded
Accrued Liability Fund to the Teachers' Retirement
System of Louisiana for application to the balance
of the unfunded accrued liability of the system
existing as of June 30, 1988 $ 1,175,515
SCHEDULE 19
HIGHER EDUCATION
19-671 BOARD OF REGENTS
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Supporting
Programs, Opportunities, Resources, and Teams
Fund to the Board of Regents for disbursement to
eligible institutions $ 23,880,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Student Financial Assistance
Program for TOPS awards $ 2,566,188
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium
Program to align with the most recent REC
forecast $ 697
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the TOPS Fund
to the Office of Student Financial Assistance
Program for TOPS awards $ 7,721,699
Page 18 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Office of Student Financial Assistance, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of State General
Fund (Direct) by ($7,721,699) to align with the most recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast.
19-600 LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors due to changes in
enrollment $ 9,377,820
Provided, however, that the monies appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated for each of the higher education institutions as follows:
Louisiana State University - A & M College $ 2,000,000
Louisiana State University - Alexandria $ 4,306,203
Louisiana State University - Eunice $ 3,071,617
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for science lab renovations at the
Louisiana State University - Shreveport campus $ 295,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors
for a parking garage design at LSU - Alexandria $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for campus security upgrades at
Louisiana State - University A&M College $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the nursing program at
Louisiana State University - Alexandria $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the Louisiana State
University - Agricultural Center for the St. Mary
Parish 4-H extension program for the
shooting sports program $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the School of Dentistry at Louisiana
State University Health Sciences Center
New Orleans $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University Health
Sciences Center New Orleans for the Louisiana
Tumor Registry for an information system for
firefighter cancer $ 100,000
Page 19 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the Louisiana State
University - A&M College Police Department $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors for Louisiana
State University - A&M College due to an
increase in enrollment $ 381,434
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors for Louisiana
State University - A&M College to align with
the most recent REC forecast $ 28,426
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors
to align with the most recent REC forecast $ 353,058
Provided, however, the $353,058 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors shall be
allocated as follows:
LSU - A&M College $ 155,827
LSU - Alexandria $ 4,825
LSU Health Sciences Center - Shreveport $ 48,302
LSU Health Sciences Center - New Orleans $ 74,273
LSU - Eunice $ 4,491
LSU - Shreveport $ 11,356
LSU - Agricultural Center $ 52,290
Pennington Biomedical Research Center $ 1,694
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco Tax
Health Care Fund to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors to align with
the most recent REC forecast $ 724,438
Provided, however, the $724,438 in Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco Tax Health
Care Fund to the Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors shall be allocated as
follows:
LSU Health Sciences Center - Shreveport $ 388,480
LSU - Agricultural Center $ 335,958
19-615 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Southern University
Board of Supervisors due to changes in enrollment $ 5,007,685
Provided, however, that the monies appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated for each of the higher education institutions as follows:
Page 20 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Southern University - Agricultural & Mechanical
College $ 4,000,000
Southern University - Law Center $ 1,007,685
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of Supervisors
for the Southern University Agricultural &
Mechanical College School of Nursing for operation
of the JAG Mobile and innovative health clinic on
wheels $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of Supervisors
for continuing education and student services at
Southern University - Agricultural & Mechanical
College $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of Supervisors
for success initiatives and workforce training at
Southern University - Shreveport $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of Supervisors
for construction of the Southern University Global
Innovation Building at Southern University -
Agricultural & Mechanical College $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of Supervisors
for the Southern University - Agricultural &
Mechanical College for the marching band $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Southern University
Board of Supervisors for Southern University -
A&M College to align with the most recent
REC forecast $ 9,423
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Southern University Board of Supervisors to
align with the most recent REC forecast $ 50,959
Provided, however, the $50,959 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Southern University Board of Supervisors shall be allocated as
follows:
Southern University - A & M College $ 33,366
Southern University - Law Center $ 3,643
Southern University - New Orleans $ 9,537
Southern University - Shreveport $ 3,413
Southern University - Agricultural Research & Extension Center $ 1,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Southern University Board of Supervisors to the Southern University - A
& M by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund by Interagency Transfers
by ($879,564).
Page 21 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
19-620 UNIVERSITY OF LOUISIANA BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the University of
Louisiana Board of Supervisors due to changes in
enrollment $ 3,724,610
Provided, however, that the monies appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated for each of the higher education institutions as follows:
Louisiana Tech University $ 3,724,610
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the University of
Louisiana Board of Supervisors for operating
expenses, including the Canvas Management
System $ 1,680,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for trees and landscaping at Southeastern Louisiana
University $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for athletic equipment at Nicholls State University $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for LNG Center of Excellence at McNeese State
University $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for the Department of Electrical and Computer
Engineering at the University of Louisiana at
Lafayette to research, design, develop, and maintain
low earth orbiting satellites through the Cajun
Advanced Picosatellite Experiment Program
(C.A.P.E.) $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for Grambling State University for partnerships $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for Nicholls State University for athletic equipment $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
to align with the most recent REC forecast $ 285,797
Provided, however, the $285,797 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors shall be allocated
as follows:
Nicholls State University $ 20,119
Grambling State University $ 18,773
Page 22 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Louisiana Tech University $ 35,532
McNeese State University $ 22,914
University of Louisiana at Monroe $ 33,908
Northwestern State University $ 23,471
Southeastern Louisiana University $ 37,193
University of Louisiana at Lafayette $ 47,909
University of New Orleans $ 45,978
19-649 LOUISIANA COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES BOARD
OF SUPERVISORS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges System Board of Supervisors for the
River Parishes Community College for equipment
and training programs at training sites $ 7,700,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Louisiana Community
and Technical Colleges System Board of Supervisors
due to changes in enrollment $ 3,440,000
Provided, however, that the monies appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated for each of the higher education institutions as follows:
Baton Rouge Community College $ 1,000,000
Nunez Community College $ 1,050,000
SOWELA Technical Community College $ 200,000
Northshore Technical Community College $ 590,000
South Louisiana Community College $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Community and Technical College
Board of Supervisors for Northshore Technical
College for patient navigator programming $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors for South Louisiana Community
College T.H. Harris Campus for the allied health
expansion $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors to align with the most
recent REC forecast $ 92,642
Provided, however, the $92,642 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges Board of
Supervisors shall be allocated as follows:
Baton Rouge Community College $ 13,457
Delgado Community College $ 22,955
Nunez Community College $ 2,634
Bossier Parish Community College $ 8,234
South Louisiana Community College $ 13,455
River Parishes Community College $ 4,346
Louisiana Delta Community College $ 7,256
Northwest Louisiana Technical Community College $ 3,930
Page 23 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
SOWELA Technical Community College $ 5,508
L.E. Fletcher Technical Community College $ 3,100
Northshore Technical Community College $ 4,038
Central Louisiana Technical Community College $ 3,729
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
19-656 SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Special Schools Program for the River Oaks
Hospital in New Orleans and Brentwood Hospital
in Shreveport $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Louisiana School for the
Deaf Program to align with the most recent
Revenue Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 1,464
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Louisiana School for the
Visually Impaired Program to align with the
most recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast $ 1,205
19-657 JIMMY D. LONG, SR. LOUISIANA SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCE,
AND THE ARTS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Living and Learning Community Program
for operating expenses $ 137,226
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Living and Learning
Community Program to align with the most
recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast $ 5,403
19-658 THRIVE ACADEMY
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Instruction Program for a new security
system $ 290,104
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Instruction Program for major repairs $ 2,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Instruction Program
to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 4,152
19-662 LOUISIANA EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION AUTHORITY
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Broadcasting Program for WYES television
station $ 100,000
Page 24 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
19-673NEW ORLEANS CENTER FOR THE CREATIVE ARTS
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the NOCCA Instruction
Program to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 5,017
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
19-678 STATE ACTIVITIES
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the District Support
Program for operating expenses $ 1,287,481
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the District Support Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Dyslexia Fund by ($900,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for eDynamic
Learning for the purchase of digital curriculum
programs, specifically Ready for Industry Adult
Education and Learning Blade $ 360,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for the Louisiana
Children's Research Center for Development and
Learning, Inc. for the Center for Literacy and
Learning for a pilot program to support low
performing and rural schools $ 2,500,000
Payable out of Federal Funds to the District
Support Program for operations $ 7,234,520
19-681 SUBGRANTEE ASSISTANCE
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues to the Federal Support
Program for career and technical education programs
through Carl Perkins grant funding $ 630,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Non Federal Support
Program to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 14,959,327
19-695 MINIMUM FOUNDATION PROGRAM
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund (Direct) by ($52,000,000).
Page 25 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Lottery Proceeds Fund to the Minimum
Foundation Program to align with the most
recent Revenue Estimating Conference (REC)
forecast $ 16,809,794
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Legislative Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($16,809,794) to align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Minimum Foundation Program to align with
the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 1,827,358
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Legislative Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($1,827,358) to align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast.
LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER
HEALTH CARE SERVICES DIVISION
19-610 LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY HEALTH CARE SERVICES
DIVISION
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues for Lallie
Kemp Regional Medical Center $ 6,220,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Lallie Kemp Regional Medical Center, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Legislative Session, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Interagency Transfers by ($4,560,000).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Lallie Kemp Regional Medical Center, as contained in Act No. 1 of the
2025 Regular Legislative Session, by reducing the appropriation out of Federal Funds by
($1,660,000).
SCHEDULE 20
OTHER REQUIREMENTS
20-451 LOCAL HOUSING OF STATE ADULT OFFENDERS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Local Housing of Adult Offenders Program
for increases in population in local housing
facilities $ 5,250,556
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Local Reentry Services Program, as contained in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund (Direct) by ($700,876).
Page 26 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Criminal Justice Reinvestment Initiative Program as contained in Act No.
1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($4,549,680).
20-452 LOCAL HOUSING OF STATE JUVENILE OFFENDERS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Local Housing of State Juvenile Offenders
Program for the housing of the youth population
in local detention centers $ 1,691,307
20-901 SALES TAX DEDICATIONS
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Acadia Parish
Visitor Enterprise Fund to the Acadia Parish
Convention and Visitors Commission for the
promotion of tourism and economic development
in Acadia Parish $ 27,756
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Cameron Parish
Tourism Development Fund to the Cameron Parish
Police Jury for use as provided in
R.S. 47:302.25 $ 200,000
20-924 VIDEO DRAW POKER - LOCAL GOVERNMENT AID
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the State Aid Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Video Draw Poker Device Fund by ($702,536) to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating Conference (REC) forecast.
20-926 SPORTS WAGERING LOCAL ALLOCATION FUND
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Sports Wagering
Local Allocation Fund to the Sports Wagering Local
Allocation Fund Program for payments to locals $ 2,950,000
20-927 LOCAL REVENUE FUND
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Local Revenue
Fund to the Local Revenue Fund Program to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 18,741,109
20-931 LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT – DEBT SERVICE AND
STATE COMMITMENTS
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Major Events
Incentive Fund to the Debt Service and State
Commitments Program for golf course
improvements for the LIV Golf event $ 700,000
Page 27 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Debt Service and State Commitments Program, as contained in Act No.
1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Major Events Incentive Fund by
($750,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Debt Service and State Commitments
Program for programmatic expenses and economic
development initiatives, including but not
limited to the High Impact Jobs Program $ 50,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Site Investment
and Infrastructure Improvement Fund to the Debt
Service and State Commitments Program for
additional awards $ 60,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Major Events
Incentive Fund to the Debt Service and State
Commitments Program for the Independence Bowl $ 400,000
20-941 AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY – PASS THROUGH FUNDS
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Agriculture and Forestry - Pass Through
Funds Program for Louisiana Agricultural Finance
Authority for two (2) additional grain bins for the
Rice Rail Facility project $ 1,950,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Agriculture and Forestry - Pass Through
Funds Program for an increase to the Soil and Water
Conservation Districts $ 209,109
20-945 STATE AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITIES
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Law Enforcement District
for the implementation, management, and operation
of an incarceration program to provide offenders with
skilled trades $ 1,495,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Law Enforcement District
for the creation and establishment of an
incarceration program to provide offenders with
skilled trades $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the North Lake Charles Economic Development
District for personnel services and operating
expenses $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Gilbert to upgrade sewage
infrastructure $ 350,000
Page 28 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Haughton for improvements to the
public works facility $ 287,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Haughton for street and drainage
improvements $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Haughton for the acquisition of a
mobile emergency generator for water and sewage
infrastructure $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Haughton for road improvements at
the sewer treatment facility $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East-Central Bossier Parish Fire District
No. 1 for the acquisition of self-contained breathing
appliances $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Sterlington $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jackson Parish Police Jury for the Jackson
Parish Ambulance Service District for operating
expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Purchase Gardens and Zoo, Inc. for
the purchase of a new boat $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Lighthouse Louisiana for a new paper towel
manufacturing machine and facility upgrades $ 1,250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Team Gleason Foundation for wheelchairs $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Woodmere Youth Collaborative Board for
youth development programs $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Growth Economic Development
Association for community programs $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
community programs $ 290,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Sheriff's Office for equipment
and overtime costs for the Rapides Area Drug
Enforcement Program $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Kenner for upgrades at the Muss
Bertolino Playground $ 500,000
Page 29 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Kenner Police Department for license
plate recognition cameras and body cameras $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Independence for the demolition
of a water tower $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Independence for new vehicles and
equipment for the Police Department $ 45,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Independence for professional
consulting services for a master plan $ 45,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for landscaping on
Hipark Boulevard $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for landscaping on
Southwest Railroad Avenue $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for catch basins and
culverts in Council District 2 $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for intersection
improvements including curbing $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Tangipahoa Parish Government for
landscaping on University Boulevard $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for police training center
upgrades $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Hammond for constructing airport
hangars $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Springfield for bathroom and parking
lot upgrades at Springfield Park $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Columbia for the widening of
Riser Street for commercial improvement $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Alliance of Children's Advocacy
Centers $ 586,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Teach for America, Inc. $ 250,000
Page 30 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Young Men's Christian Association of the
Capital Area for childhood swimming program
partnership with the East Baton Rouge Parish
School System $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Feeding Louisiana for the purchase of food
for food banks $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sci-Port Discovery Center for expansion of
programs $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for street
lighting improvements for Causeway Boulevard $ 550,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Foundation Against Sexual
Assault, Inc. for services at the Metro Center for
Community Advocacy $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to 21st Century Workforce Development $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Songs of Survivors for healing song writing
workshops for military veterans $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ouachita Parish Police Jury for patch and
overlay on portions of Standard Reed Road $ 410,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ouachita Parish Police Jury for drainage
improvements to D'Arbonne Hills Subdivision $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ouachita Parish School Board for custom
lighting and signage for the crosswalk at Drew
Elementary School $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Ouachita Green for the collection of hazardous
waste within Ouachita Parish $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish School Board for lights at
DeRidder High School $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Vernon Parish School Board for parking lot
improvements at Leesville High School $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Vernon Parish Sheriff's Office for a storage
shed $ 50,000
Page 31 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Sheriff's Office for window
repairs in the Emergency Preparedness building $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Rosepine for road maintenance on
Louisiana Avenue near Rosepine Elementary School
and Rosepine High School $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of New Llano for parking lot repair and
refurbishment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Thibodaux for the Police Department
for vehicles, equipment, and supplies $ 265,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Thibodaux for upgrades to the Stark
Municipal Complex $ 800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafourche Parish Government for operating
expenses $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Lake Charles Department of
Recreation and Parks for park improvements at
University Park and Nelson Road Park $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Endowment for the Humanities for
operating expenses $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Mary Bird Perkins Cancer Center $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Associated Professional Educators of
Louisiana $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the following Food Banks, pro rata: Food Bank
of Northeast Louisiana, Inc.; Food Bank of
Northwest Louisiana; Second Harvest Food Bank
of Greater New Orleans and Acadiana, Inc.; The
Food Bank of Central Louisiana, Inc.; and Greater
Baton Rouge Food Bank, Inc. $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Resource Optimization Collaborative for
research and operations $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Grandparents Raising Grandchildren
Information Center of Louisiana, Inc. for operating
expenses $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Madison Parish Police Jury for road repairs
to Cow Bayou Road $ 1,750,000
Page 32 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Delhi for Cave Theater renovations $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the West Carroll Parish Sheriff's Office for
purchases of radios, equipment, fuel tanks, trailers,
and generators $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafayette Police Department for a K9
training facility $ 220,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Arpadhon Hungarian Settlement Cultural
Association for labor, materials, and supplies for
building renovations $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Albany Police Department for
equipment, gear, and computer acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish Government for Fire
Protection District No. 1 for gear and equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish Government for Fire
Protection District No. 2 for labor, materials, and
supplies for training center construction and
renovations $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Livingston Fire Department for gear,
equipment, and acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Livingston Police Department for
gear, equipment, and vehicle acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Ida for water and sewer
improvements $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Oil City for water and sewer
improvements $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Greenwood for water and sewer
improvements $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Arnaudville Police Department for
cameras $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Breaux Bridge Police Department for
a storage building $ 25,000
Page 33 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Henderson Police Department for
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Leonville Police Department for
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Melville Police Department for
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Parks Police Department for
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Krotz Springs Police Department
for operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Delta Food System Network for East Carroll
Parish, Madison Parish, Tensas Parish, and
Concordia Parish $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Tensas Parish Fire District No. 1 for equipment
purchases $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Concordia Parish School Board for Ferriday
High School for football equipment purchases $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Jefferson Parish Council District 1 for
infrastructure, repairs, and upgrades at
Terrytown Playground and other recreational
facilities $ 170,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Archbishop Shaw High School for stadium and
track improvements $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Gretna for roofing repairs at the
Louisiana State Fire Museum $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bright School for the Deaf $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the YWCA of Greater Baton Rouge for
workforce development services, emergency rental
assistance, homeless prevention services, and
domestic violence housing $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Love Impact Coalition, Inc. for support of a
large-scale healthcare clinic providing critical
medical, dental, and vision service across Louisiana $ 100,000
Page 34 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Communities in Schools of the Gulf South, Inc.
for the delivery of social work services in local
schools $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Bernard Parish Sheriff's Office for the
construction of a real-time crime center $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Bernard Parish Government for the
purchase of a new fire alarm system at Val Riess
Park $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Bernard Parish Government for the
purchase of a fence at Patricia Park $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Bernard Parish Government for the
purchase of a concession stand at Val Riess Park $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Bernard Parish Government for the
purchase of a new electrical system at Carolyn Park $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Welsh for equipment purchases and
maintenance $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Lake Arthur for police, fire, and
recreation acquisitions, equipment, and
maintenance $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Jennings for equipment purchases
and maintenance $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Iowa for equipment purchases
and maintenance $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Davis Parish Police Jury $ 67,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Davis Council on Aging, Inc. $ 22,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Mary Bird Perkins Cancer Center for the
Gonzales center for the mobile breast cancer
testing unit, facility upgrades, equipment, and
community outreach program $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. James Parish School Board for Career and
College Centers, the Cosmetology program, and
internships in the Business, Manufacturing, and
Health Programs $ 200,000
Page 35 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Love Impact Coalition, Inc. for operating
expenses at healthcare clinics in Ascension and
St. John Parishes $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Government for operating
expenses and educational and enrichment programs
for students and parents $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. James Parish School Board for St. James
High School and Lutcher High School athletic
departments $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the West Ascension Parish Hospital for the
summer health careers internship program $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. John the Baptist Parish Government for
economic development and tourism programs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Hopkins Street Economic Development
District for operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of St. Martinville for blight remediation $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Iberia Parish Government for the Railroad
Avenue Historic Cultural Economic District and
the Rho Omicron Foundation for operating services $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Iberia for youth programs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish School Board for academic
materials and capital improvements to be split equally
at Walker Elementary School, Northside Elementary
School, Freshwater Elementary School, Juban Parc
Junior High School, and South Fork Junior High
School $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish School Board for capital
improvements, supplies, and equipment specifically
related to campus safety and security at Denham
Springs High School $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish School Board for academic
materials, capital improvements, and sports
equipment at Walker High School $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Launch for patient supplies, equipment, and
capital improvements $ 20,000
Page 36 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Mighty Moms for supplies, food, meal
kits, and equipment $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Christian Home Educators Fellowship of
Baton Rouge, Inc. for athletic supplies and
equipment, capital improvements, and other student
related expenses $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Black Data Processing Associates Monroe
Chapter for pre-information technology readiness
and industry certification training for able-bodied
workers and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program recipients $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Tab-N-Action, Inc. for the implementation of the
Division of Youth Services group home system
pilot program for non-violent juvenile offenders
ages of thirteen to eighteen for the Louisiana House
of Representatives District Nos. 16 and 17 $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ahayah Community Development
Corporation for the revitalization and construction
of affordable houses for first-time homeowners
around the Louisiana Purchase Gardens and Zoo
area $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of White Castle for equipment and
furniture in the new community training center $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Rosedale for operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Grosse Tete for operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Assumption Parish Police Jury for park
equipment and upgrades to Gilbert Dupaty
Memorial Park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Assumption Parish Police Jury for
equipment for the Pierre Part volunteer fire
department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The ARC - Iberville for operating expenses $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lakeview Boosters Club of New Orleans for
lighting improvements at the Lakeview Playground in
New Orleans $ 75,000
Page 37 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Friends of Lakeview, Inc. for walking path
installation $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for the
Bucktown Harbor Project and pavilion $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the City Park Conservancy for bridge lighting and
preservation of Spanish Fort at City Park $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lakeshore Property Owners Association, Inc.
for oak tree planting, pruning, and maintenance $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lake Vista Property Owners Association
Incorporated for oak tree planting, pruning, and
maintenance $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Pontchartrain Conservancy for water quality
results outreach $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for lighting and neutral
ground improvements between Maryland Drive and
Fairway Drive $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Fordoche for the construction of a
maintenance shed $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Livonia for a new water well $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Centre for the Arts for capital projects that
service all schools in Pointe Coupee Parish $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Pointe Coupee Parish Government for water
system upgrades $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Pointe Coupee Parish Sheriff's Office for
equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Morganza for general operating
expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Maringouin for operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the LA State Penitentiary Museum Foundation
Inc. for operating services $ 50,000
Page 38 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Parish Police Jury for a shed to house oil
sands for roads $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Parish Police Jury for water for a
landfill pulp mill $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Parish Police Jury for the purchase
of a truck and equipment $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the DeSoto Parish Police Jury for GIS
equipment, database implementation, data
collection, and planning $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the DeSoto Parish Police Jury for generators $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Sheriff's Office for the
purchase of "The Rook" critical incident response
vehicle $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Assessor's Office for roof
replacement $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Sheriff's Office for the
purchase of training equipment $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of French Settlement for sidewalk
construction and related expenses $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. James Parish Government for road and
drainage improvements for Bellevue Lakes
Subdivision $ 450,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Government for roadway
improvements and roundabout construction at the
intersection of Parish Road 929 and Parish Road
930 $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Sheriff's Association, Inc. for the
purchase of a medium duty truck for the
transportation of mobile communication towers $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Government for the
Ascension Parish Courthouse for security
enhancements $ 500,000
Page 39 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Tangipahoa Parish School Board for the Jewel
M. Sumner High School baseball field $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Tangipahoa for the multi-purpose
center $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Roseland for the multi-purpose
center $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Greensburg for police supplies and
equipment $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Roseland for police supplies and
equipment $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Greensburg for the resurfacing of
South Main Street $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Heroes of New Orleans $ 18,050
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Algiers Economic Development Foundation,
Inc. $ 100,569
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans Military and Maritime
Academy, Inc. $ 131,378
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for the Mayor's Office
of Cultural Economy for creation of opportunities
to stimulate the economy and preserve cultural
traditions $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central City Economic Opportunity
Corporation to promote economic opportunity in
Central City New Orleans $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Friends of Bayou St. John for visioning study
implementation and project identification and
development $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans Women & Children's Shelter,
Inc. for operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Broad Community Connections, Inc. for
streetscape elements $ 50,000
Page 40 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The 18th Ward for operating costs and a
renovation project $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Raices Nuevas for operating costs $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Empowering the Community for Excellence for
program and tutoring materials and equipment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Acadia Council on Aging, Inc. for
transportation services $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Acadia Parish Police Jury for Acadia Parish
Animal Control for facility upgrades $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Acadia Parish Police Jury for Fire Protection
District No. 8 for facility construction $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Acadia Parish Police Jury for distribution
pro rata to Fire Protection District Nos. 2, 5, 7, 9,
and 11 for protection equipment upgrades $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Duson Volunteer Fire Department
for protection equipment upgrades $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Crowley Fire Department for
equipment upgrades $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Mermentau for city hall
infrastructure upgrades $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Caddo Parish Commission for
neighborhood beautification $ 225,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Caddo Parish Sheriff's Office for the Caddo
Parish Sheriff Law Enforcement District for youth
and senior citizen programming $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Etta Pete Sickle Cell Anemia Foundation, Inc.
for operating expenses $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Gray's Army Foundation, Inc. for operating
expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Caring-To-Love Ministries, Inc. for operating
expenses $ 25,000
Page 41 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Launch for new building and clinic costs,
including planning and design $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish Government for the
Livingston Animal Shelter for the spay and neuter
program $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Metanoia, Inc. for operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Stillwaters Refuge of Hope for acquisitions and
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Baton Rouge Parish School Board for
broadband, school safety, and resource officers at
Northeast Elementary School $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Baton Rouge Parish School Board for
broadband, school safety, and resource officers at
Northeast High School $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Mighty Moms for operating expenses and the
Full Tummy Program $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for
repairs, milling, and overlaying of Marthaville
Street $ 170,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for white
rock installation for Mora Baptist Church Road $ 130,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for the
construction of the animal control facility $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Gorum Community Center for facility
construction $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Waterproof for multi parish initiatives $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Opportunities Industrialization Center
Incorporated of Ouachita for workforce readiness,
training, and development $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the ARC of Caddo-Bossier for the Goldman
School and Child Development Centers investments
in the TRAN initiative $ 50,000
Page 42 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Holy Angels Residential Facility for
emergency preparation work $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Volunteers of America North Louisiana for a
homeless veterans communities in school program $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bossier Parish Police Jury for improvements
to Lake Bistineau $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Bridge Alzheimer's and Dementia Resource
Center for a day worker $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish Government for
St. Tammany Recreation District No. 5 for
dredging of Pearl River $ 105,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Abita Springs for repairs to the town
hall $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Jackson Police Department for
supplies $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Norwood Police Department for
supplies $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Baker for supplies $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lions Club of Jackson, Inc. for signage $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Feliciana Council on Aging, Inc. for
operating expenses $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Jackson for supplies $ 4,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Feliciana 4-H Foundation, Inc. for a
double axle trailer $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Clinton Volunteer Fire Department
for repairs on the Highway 67 building $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Zachary Police Department for
bicycles $ 8,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Clinton is Home for road improvements on
Highway 10 $ 9,000
Page 43 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Backwoods TNR for the trap, neuter, and
release of cats $ 8,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Baker Police Department for supplies $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Swift Medical Staffing Agency, LLC for
ground infrastructure, improvements, and
maintenance $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Feliciana Parish School Board for East
Feliciana High School for the baseball field $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Slaughter for supplies and repairs $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Feliciana Area Agricultural, Recreational &
Marketing Corporation for the Clinton Arena for
infrastructure repairs $ 16,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Stonebridge Neighborhood Improvement and
Beautification District for facility improvements $ 55,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Stonebridge Neighborhood Improvement and
Beautification District for the community park $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for the Parks
and Recreation Department for Oakdale Playground $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
improvements to Fort Jackson $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Plaquemines Community C.A.R.E. Centers
Foundation, Inc. for building safety, emergency
preparedness, and the delivery of child advocacy
and behavioral health services $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Abbeville for the Abbeville Fire
Department for the purchase of a new fire truck $ 220,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
improvements to Empire Park $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
improvements to Diamond Park $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
improvements to the park on Avenue A $ 25,000
Page 44 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafayette Parish Consolidated Government
for crosswalk signals on Highway 92 near
St. Joseph's Church in Milton $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana at Lafayette
Foundation for workforce development $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Council District 3
for community programs $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for pedestrian crosswalks on
Pontchartrain Drive $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for the Slidell Heritage Festival $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for fencing on Kensington
Boulevard $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for improvements to Heritage
Park $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for improvements at Cawthorn
Park $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Friends of Slidell Police Foundation for
operating expenses $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Our Friends Closet for operating expenses $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Savannah Smiles, Inc. for operating costs $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for improvements at Rue
Rochelle Park $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Terrebonne Parish Fire District 6 for the
Montegut Fire Department for equipment
and supplies $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bourg Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment and supplies $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Little Caillou Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment and supplies $ 42,000
Page 45 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Grand Caillou Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment and supplies $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bayou Dularge Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment and supplies $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Village East Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment and supplies $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Lighthouse Ministries, Inc. for facility and living
space improvements and security upgrades $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Oakdale Dixie Girls Softball, Inc. for public
facility and grounds improvements $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Allen Parish Clerk of Court for court records
and mapping system maintenance $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the American Legion Post No. 244 in Kinder for
facility improvements $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Allen Parish School Board for athletics at
Fairview High School $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Kinder Police Department for public
safety improvements $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ward Five Marshal's Office in Oakdale for
equipment, software, storage, and operating
expenses $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Allen Parish Fair Association for facility
improvements and construction of barns, concession
stands, bleachers, and additional bathrooms $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Oberlin for street improvements $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Sheriff's Office for facility
improvements $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Allen Parish Recreation District No. 4 for
public facility and grounds improvements $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Kenner for infrastructure and
beautification upgrades $ 350,000
Page 46 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the YWCA of Greater Baton Rouge $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the 29:11 Academy $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Hospice Foundation of Greater Baton Rouge $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Girl Scouts Louisiana East, Inc. $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Gulf States Renewable Energy Industries
Association $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Zachary for the Zachary Public
Cemetery for operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Future Seed for a fresh food market $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Leonard W. Eli, Veterans of Foreign War
Post No. 8852 for building improvements $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sickle Cell Anemia Resource Foundation, Inc.
for operating expenses $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cenla Community Action, Committee,
Incorporated for financial literacy classes and home
ownership $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Greater Alexandria Economic Development
Authority for a first-time home ownership housing
program and financial literacy $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Women in Search of Excellence Foundation
for building improvements, programs, and operating
expenses $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Youth Village Restoration Center, Inc. for
operating expenses and programmatic expenses $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the City Court of Baton Rouge for the Baton
Rouge City Constable's Office for acquisitions and
equipment purchases $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the YWCA of Greater Baton Rouge for personal
services and programmatic expenses $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to City Year, Inc. for program expenses $ 10,000
Page 47 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Basile for electronic water meters $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for the Facade
Improvement Program $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Wetlands Educational Center $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Archbishop Shaw High School for the school
festival $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Visitation of Our Lady Church for a church
fair $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Schools for John Ehret
High School $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Anthony church in the town of Lafitte for
the church fair $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Keep Westbank Beautiful, Inc. for operating
expenses $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for the Parks
and Recreation Department for improvements to
Bent Tree Tot Lot $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Council on the Aging $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for the Parks
and Recreation Department for the Golden Age
Center $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Cankton for recreational
infrastructure and equipment upgrades and water
system upgrades $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Jean Lafitte Police Department $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Gingerbread House Bossier-Caddo Children's
Advocacy Center, Inc. for operating services $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Bossier City for the construction of
basketball courts and a sand volleyball court at
local parks and a freeze protection system for the
water treatment plant $ 110,000
Page 48 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Port Barre Police Department for
equipment $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Grand Coteau Police Department
for equipment $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Sunset Police Department for
equipment $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Washington for operating expenses $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Landry Parish Government for
infrastructure improvements and aviation
programming $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Opelousas for infrastructure
improvements $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the J.S. Clark Leadership Academy for equipment
and operations $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Carencro Police Department for
equipment and operations $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Landry Parish School Board for equipment
and maintenance $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Leadership Institute $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Centerville Volunteer Fire Department for
acquisitions and equipment $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Baldwin for renovations to the town
hall $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bayou Vista Volunteer Fire Department for
training and equipment $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Stephensville Volunteer Fire Department $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Franklin for the Soul Food Festival and
kitchen equipment for the recreation department $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Baldwin Police Department for
equipment $ 10,000
Page 49 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Patterson for renovations to the park
on Park Street $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Berwick for the Light House Festival
and the Markee Civic Center $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Morgan City for renovations to Lake
End Park and the city fire department for
acquisitions and equipment $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Mary Parish Government for satellite-
based internet and telecommunications
equipment $ 41,950
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Mary Parish Government for Centerville
Park $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Franklin for equipment $ 3,050
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Mary Parish Government for park
equipment and operating expenses $ 58,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Saint Alphonsus Catholic School for new
computers in the computer lab $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central Private School for a new computer
lab $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central Athletic Foundation for sports
equipment and weight room equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central Community School Board for new
computers $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Baton Rouge Consolidated Government
for the Baton Rouge Police Department for the
officer wellness program $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans East Hospital Foundation
for equipment $ 750,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans East Senior Center for
programming and operations $ 10,000
Page 50 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Westside Foundation Inc., for programs and
services to support community development, social
services, and educational initiatives $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the McKinley High School Alumni Association
for the McKinley Alumni Center for operational
support, capital improvements, and services
to preserve the historical and educational legacy $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to LAEHCY - Louisiana Association for the
Education of Homeless Children and Youth for
operating expenses $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the East Baton Rouge Consolidated Government
for programs and services to support community
development, social services, and educational
initiatives in Metropolitan Council District 10 $ 110,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cancer Association of Greater
New Orleans, Inc. $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Orleans Parish Sheriff's Office for domestic
violence prevention $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to City Year, Inc. for student educational resources $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to YouthForce NOLA for workforce development $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Feeding Louisiana for local food purchases $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Terrebonne Consolidated Government
for firefighting equipment $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Morgan City Fire Department for
repairs and upgrades $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Mary Parish Government for drainage
improvements for the community of Amelia $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Labadieville Volunteer Fire Department for
equipment $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Assumption Parish Police Jury for Bayou
L'Ourse Gravity Drainage District No. 1 for drainage
maintenance and improvements $ 15,000
Page 51 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Assumption Parish Police Jury for drainage
improvements for the community of Labadieville $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bayou Blue Volunteer Fire Department
for training equipment $ 90,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafourche Parish Government for clearing of
St. Louis Bayou $ 90,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Key Academy at Saint Mary
Magdelan for sidewalk access and parking lot
improvements $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for Lafreniere
Park for repairs to the Marsha Island Bridge $ 110,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Harahan for an emergency generator
at city hall $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Harahan for an emergency generator at
the Royland Firehouse $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish School Board for physical
education supplies, computer equipment, charging
carts, and supplies for high dosage tutoring at
Harahan Elementary $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish School Board for physical
education supplies, computer equipment, charging
carts, and supplies for high dosage tutoring at
Green Park Elementary $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Board School for special
playground equipment at Hazel Park Elementary $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish School Board for equipment
for physical education classes at Bissonnet Plaza
School and classroom-based libraries $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for
improvements at the Delta Playground $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for lighting
on the youth field at Mike Miley Park $ 50,000
Page 52 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana Guardianship Services, Inc. for
essential services for vulnerable adults under court
appointed curatorship $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Harahan Police Department for
computers and computer upgrades $ 90,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Harahan Police Department for
service weapons, upfit upgrades, and police
equipment $ 85,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Third District Volunteer
Fire Department for bunker gear $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of St. George for Pecue Lane and Reiger
Road intersections and median improvements $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Baton Rouge Speech and Hearing Foundation,
Inc. for expenses and infrastructure $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Erath for road projects including
matching funds $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Delcambre for road projects and
emergency generators $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Port of Iberia District for cameras $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Iberia Parish Government for the Lydia
Veterans Memorial $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Youngsville for road improvements $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Early Start Alliance for the Parent
Advancement Pilot Program $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Twin Steeples, Inc. for building repairs $ 55,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Ponchatoula for operations $ 120,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Society, Daughters of the
American Revolution for the purchase of an
America 250 marker $ 5,000
Page 53 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Tangipahoa Parish Council on Aging for
operations $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Restoration Pregnancy Resource Center, Inc.
for operations $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Tangipahoa Parish Government for piling
installation for signs $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Tangipahoa Parish Government for renovations
to the Husser Community Center $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish School Board for an
outdoor courtyard, greenhouse, learning garden, and
food nutrition project at Madisonville Elementary
School $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish School Board for an
assembly room sound system and technology
improvements at Mandeville Junior High School $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish School Board for a
sensory playground for students with disabilities at
Pontchartrain Elementary School $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Northlake Crisis Pregnancy Center, Inc. for
operating expenses $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Habitat for Humanity St. Tammany West for
the down payment program, land acquisitions, and
ongoing home maintenance needs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bulldogs Quarterback Club for training facility
upgrades on the Fountainebleau High School campus $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. John the Baptist Parish District
Attorney's Office for the Opportunity Now
Diversion Program $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rotary Club of St. John the Baptist Parish for
community outreach $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. John the Baptist Parish School Board for
Fifth Ward Preparatory Elementary School for
tutoring $ 30,000
Page 54 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Riverlands Christian Center, Incorporated for
tutoring programs $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Boutte Community Outreach Program, Inc.
for tutoring and outreach $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Wine Development Corporation, Inc. for
community outreach and tutoring $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Diocese of Houma-Thibodaux for repairs
and improvements to the Disaster Response
Warehouse $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Restore Grand Isle for restorations to the
Oleander Hotel $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafourche Parish Government for Recreation
District No. 8 for community playground
improvements $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Golden Meadow for equipment
and acquisition of a vehicle $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Lockport for a basketball court and
picnic tables at Bayou Side Park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bayou Playhouse, Inc. for building
improvements $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cut Off Youth Center, Inc. for building
repairs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bayou Civic Club, Inc. for repair projects and
acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafourche Parish Government for the
Racecard Agriculture Pavilion $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lafourche Council on Aging, Inc. for the
Meals on Wheels program $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Union Parish Police Jury for building
improvements to the courthouse $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Farmerville for the water and sewer
systems $ 100,000
Page 55 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lincoln Parish Police Jury for infrastructure $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Ruston for upgrades to the civic center $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lincoln Parish Sheriff's Office for equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana at Lafayette
Foundation for workforce development $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Community Foundation of Acadiana to
support efforts in House District 44 $ 85,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Caddo Parish School Board for the Film and
Entertainment Certificate Program at Huntington
High School $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lowe McFarlane Post #14 of the American
Legion, Inc. for building maintenance and upkeep $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of St. George for asphalt overlay and
road improvements $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Echo-Cheneyville Cutoff Road $ 55,702
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Lynell Road $ 314,168
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Moss Ridge Drive $ 327,369
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Brooksie Lane $ 194,388
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Susan Drive $ 166,062
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Big Island Loop $ 950,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Deville Cutoff Road $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Lucas Road $ 450,000
Page 56 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for road
improvements to Pete Paul Road $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ascension Parish Council on Aging, Inc. for
furniture and equipment $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Shreveport for infrastructure
improvements in House District 3 and for
Shreveport Public Assembly and Recreation
for the travel track team $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Acadia Parish Police Jury for Pointe
Noir Road $ 900,100
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jefferson Parish Government for sewer
improvements $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bridge House Corporation for operating
expenses $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Minden for a generator for Robertson
Lift Station $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Webster Parish Police Jury for equipment and
bedding for the women's jail $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Springhill for street repairs and
upgrades $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Shongaloo for civic center repairs $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Heflin for a lawn mower and body
cameras $ 12,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Sibley for a generator for primary lift
station $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Cotton Valley for roof repairs to the
town hall $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Dixie Inn for the purchase of an
ATV and trailer $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Plain Dealing for repairs to the
waste water system $ 25,000
Page 57 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Doyline for a lawnmower $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Dubberly for repairs to the town
hall $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Parole Project, Inc. for operations
and acquisitions $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Big River Economic and Agricultural
Development Alliance for operations and
acquisitions $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Baton Rouge Alliance for Students for
operations and acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Economic Development
Corporation for an economic impact master plan $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish Government for Lake
Shore roundabout upgrades $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish Government for speed
tables for Council District 14 $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Friends of the Harbor Center for maintenance
and upgrades $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for the Keep Slidell Beautiful
program $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Thrive New Orleans for the installation of
storm water infrastructure $ 51,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Urban Conservancy for the installation of
storm water infrastructure $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Upturn Arts for training and employment $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for the Department of
Parks and Parkways for preservation and expansion
of storm water retention capacity $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for the Downtown
Development District for lighting and
improvements $ 88,000
Page 58 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the LaSalle Parish Police Jury for road improvements
to White Sulphur Springs Road $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Grant Parish Police Jury for road maintenance
and improvements $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Dry Prong for street improvements $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the LaSalle Parish Police Jury for road
construction and maintenance $ 130,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Grant Parish School Board for curriculum and
supplies $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Columbia for infrastructure
improvements on Riser Street $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Grayson for the Grayson Police
Department for the acquisition of vehicles and
equipment $ 65,367
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Catahoula Parish Sheriff's Office for the
acquisition of vehicles and equipment $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Pine Prairie for electrical and
mechanical system upgrades at the sewage plant $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Washington Parish Sheriff's Office for
community programs $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish School Board for
Bayou Lacombe Middle School for outdoor
classroom supplies and equipment $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish Recreation District No. 4
for recreational infrastructure and maintenance $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the American Friends of Lafayette-Louisiana
for instruction and educational materials $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to NAMI Southeast Louisiana for mental health
services $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Giving Hope, Inc. for the Lacombe food pantry $ 25,000
Page 59 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the St. Tammany Parish Recreation District
No. 4 for equipment for the Bayou Lacombe
Cardinals youth football program $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Scott for street overlay projects $ 719,950
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Carencro Fire Department for
renovations, acquisitions, and equipment $ 340,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Pine Prairie for a stage at the
recreation park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Turkey Creek for the city hall
parking lot improvements and construction $ 42,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Turkey Creek for water system
upgrades and improvement $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Glenmora for construction of
handicap restrooms and a metal building at
Glenmora Ball Park $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of McNary for East River Road
Waterline Extension project $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Cheneyville for the Cheneyville
Fire Station and training projects in Rapides Parish
Fire Protection District 12 $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for a generator at
Fire Protection District 5 $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Forest Hill for supplies and
equipment for water projects $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Mamou for Main Street recovery
lighting, museum restoration, and new fence at town
ballpark $ 47,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Glenmora for fire gear for town fire
chief $ 6,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Evangeline Parish Police Jury for site
improvements at Hester Health renovation project $ 100,000
Page 60 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Evangeline Parish Police Jury for the city of
Ville Platte fire station, Evangeline Fire Protection
District 2, Mamou Fire Protection District 1, Ward
4 Fire Protection District 3, and Ward 5 Fire
Protection District $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Evangeline Parish Sheriff's Office for
communication radios for the Sheriff's Mounted
Posse $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for widening of
McNary Cutoff Road $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Ville Platte for renovations to city hall $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Westlake for water mainline
relocation, bridge surveillance, and cameras for the
police department $ 184,750
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Sheriff's Office for animal
control maintenance, supplies, construction, and
equipment $ 215,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Police Jury for road
maintenance to Newt Hodges Road, Magnolia
Church Road, Pullin Road, and Dubose Road $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Festivals & Rodeo Inc. for
maintenance costs at the Sabine Parish Fairgrounds $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Many Police Department for a police
cruiser $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Anacoco to provide matching funds
for maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Fisher to provide matching funds
for maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Florien to provide matching funds
for maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Hornbeck to provide matching funds
for maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Many to provide matching funds for
maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Page 61 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Merryville to provide matching
funds for maintenance and repairs $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Police Jury to provide
matching funds for maintenance and repairs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Vernon Parish Police Jury to provide
matching funds for maintenance and repairs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Parish Police Jury to provide
matching funds for maintenance and repairs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans Recreation Department
for infrastructure at Pontchartrain Park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Eternal Seeds, Inc. for summer camp $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Dillard University for scholarships $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans Council on Aging, Inc. for
operating expenses $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Roots of Music, Inc. for youth instruments $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The Split Second Foundation, Inc. for community
outreach $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for the Mayor's Office
of Cultural Economy for culture bearers $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the GNO-ABO Charitable and Educational
Foundation, Inc. for community outreach $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the New Orleans Delta Foundation for
infrastructure $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Hearts of Hope for core care services $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Lafayette Police Department for
special response gear upgrades and procurement $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Oil Center Renaissance Association for
beautification and infrastructure $ 90,000
Page 62 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Water Institute of the Gulf for FloodID for
forecasting and decision support $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Opelousas City Marshal for
equipment and operations $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cajun Rodeo Association, Inc. for operating
expenses $ 85,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to New Orleans & Company $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Winn Parish Police Jury for the Winn Parish
Fairgrounds Pavilion $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Winnfield for improvements,
maintenance, and repairs to Lafayette Street $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for West
Wind Church Road $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for Strange
Church Road $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Ashland for operations,
acquisitions, and road improvements $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Winn Parish School Board for operating
expenses $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Winn Parish Sheriff's Office for operations
and acquisitions $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jackson Parish School Board for operations $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Hunters for the Hungry for processing expenses $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jackson Parish Police Jury $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Winn Parish Police jury for operations,
acquisitions, and road improvements $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Hodge for operations, acquisitions,
and road improvements $ 75,000
Page 63 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of East Hodge for operations,
acquisitions, and road improvements $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of North Hodge for operations,
acquisitions, and road improvements $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Bienville Parish Police Jury for operations,
acquisitions, and road improvements $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Economic Development
Alliance for the Top of the Boot Music Festival $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Enhancement Recovery Center for operations
and acquisitions $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the DeSoto Parish Police Jury for planning,
engineering, acquisition, installation, commissioning
and related site improvements for an advanced
leachate management and treatment system and
associated infrastructure at the Mundy Landfill,
including on-site treatment capabilities to reduce
storage, hauling, and long-term liability $ 10,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Beauregard Parish Law Enforcement District
for the implementation of an offender monitoring
system $ 950,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for operating expenses $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Kings & Priest Institute for youth programs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central Community School Board for the
fishing team $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Allen Parish Police Jury for control structure
remediation and improvements at Bayou Blue $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Monroe for a roof at the Strauss
Youth Academy for the Arts $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Monroe for the acquisition of a lawn
mower for the Public Works Department $ 77,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ouachita Parish Police Jury for architect and
engineering expenses for the downtown courthouse $ 650,000
Page 64 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Monroe for United Way of Northeast
Louisiana, Inc. $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of West Monroe for the West Monroe
Public Works Department for the purchase of a
grapple truck $ 225,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Hospital Service District No. 1 of Terrebonne
Parish for a PET/low dose CT system $ 750,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for
improvements to Roy Lane $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Family Reach Alliance for operations $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for
operations, acquisitions, and equipment $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Sabine Parish Police Jury for the courthouse
for maintenance and acquisitions $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to The National World War II Museum, Inc. $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Winn Veterans Memorial Association $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Basile for gas system and drainage
system projects and for roads $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Livingston Parish Government for Fire
Protection District No. 7 for gear, equipment,
and acquisitions $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Slidell for recreational infrastructure
development and upgrades, including land
acquisition $ 800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Chamber of Commerce
Foundation, Inc. $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Barataria Baptist Church, Lafitte, Louisiana
for operating expenses $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Quitman for water infrastructure $ 50,000
Page 65 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Eunice for street improvements and
city hall improvements $ 1,990,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Justice and Accountability Center of
Louisiana for expungement day $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Carencro for Ira Street turning lane $ 725,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Carencro for the city hall remodel
and acquisitions $ 625,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Carencro for Fire Station No. 2 $ 340,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Scott for overlay of Old Spanish
Trail Road $ 720,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Church Point for sewer system
improvements $ 3,900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Scott for overlay of Tabb Road $ 580,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Scott for overlay of LeViolon Road $ 395,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Association of Chiefs of Police,
Inc. for training $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for roadway
maintenance equipment and acquisitions $ 115,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Church Point for road improvements $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for the Fifth
Ward Volunteer Fire Department for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for LED
signage for the Effie Walking Track $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the West Baton Rouge Parish Fire Protection
District No. 1 for the purchase of fire apparatuses $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the office of the district attorney of the
Nineteenth Judicial District of this state for
the Louisiana Victim Services Platform $ 100,000
Page 66 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Friends of Madame John's Legacy for
infrastructure restoration and improvements,
equipment, and maintenance $ 900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Dodson for road repairs, drainage,
and operations $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cameron Parish Police Jury for drainage
improvements, equipment, dredging,
maintenance spraying, and contractors $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Carlyss Fire Department for equipment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Sulphur for fire department
equipment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Sulphur for road repairs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Houston River Fire Department for
equipment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Vinton for fire department
equipment $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Vinton for street paving $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Vermilion Parish Police Jury for drainage
improvements, equipment, dredging,
maintenance spraying, and contractors $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Bossier Parish Police Jury for improvements
to Kingston Park $ 545,200
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to St. Tammany Parish Government for a
recreational park $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Cajundome Commission for a former
Louisiana basketball coach hall of fame $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Central Community School System for
parking lot repairs and improvements $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Iberia for an odor control
system $ 450,000
Page 67 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Coushatta for parks and
recreational improvements $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Hall Summit for park
improvements $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Martin for park improvements $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Regional
Maintenance and Improvement Fund to the
Miscellaneous Aid Program to align with the
most recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast $ 1,412,624
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Tobacco Tax
Health Care Fund to the Miscellaneous Aid
Program to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 998,945
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Veterans Museum Foundation $ 300,000
20-966 SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS TO LAW ENFORCEMENT
PERSONNEL
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Firefighters' Supplemental Payments Program $ 850,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Municipal Police Supplemental Payments Program, as contained in Act
No. 1 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature, by reducing the appropriation out of
the State General Fund (Direct) by ($850,000).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Deputy Sheriffs' Supplemental Payments Program by reducing the
appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by ($6,270,764).
SCHEDULE 21
ANCILLARY APPROPRIATIONS
21-800OFFICE OF GROUP BENEFITS
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the State
Group Benefits Program for contractual
obligations and operating expenses $ 100,000,000
21-816DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE LAW
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Louisiana
Department of Health to the Administration
Program for operating expenses $ 1,000,000
Page 68 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
21-829 OFFICE OF AIRCRAFT SERVICES
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Flight Maintenance Program for equipment $ 2,000,000
SCHEDULE 23
JUDICIAL EXPENSE
23-949 LOUISIANA JUDICIARY
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Court of Appeal, Fifth Circuit, State of
Louisiana for modernization of the case
management system and replacement of equipment $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Twenty-Third Judicial District Court for
the purchase of computer hardware, software, and
related equipment $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Fortieth Judicial District Court for the
literacy clinic $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Fortieth Judicial District Court for the
drug court $ 30,000
SCHEDULE 24
LEGISLATIVE EXPENSE
24-960 LEGISLATIVE BUDGETARY CONTROL COUNCIL
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Legislative Budgetary Control Council for
the Youth Advisory Council for annual operating
expenses $ 15,000
Section 2.(A) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature in Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications for $646,322 out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the St. Tammany Parish Fund to the St.
Tammany Parish Tourist and Convention Commission/St. Tammany Parish Development
District for economic development, tourism promotion, infrastructure, and capital
improvements is hereby repealed in its entirety.
(B)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $100,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the city of Monroe for the construction of a
pedestrian walkway at the downtown Peterson rail yard pass is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
On page 46, line 42, after "Monroe" delete the remainder of the line in its entirety
and delete line 43 in its entirety and at the beginning of line 44, delete "rail yard
pass" and insert "Downtown Development District for an under-rail walkway"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(C)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 07-276 Engineering and Operations for $250,000 out of the
State General Fund (Direct) to the Operations Program for asphalt overlay and related work
Page 69 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
on LA 31 from Bridge Street to Mills Avenue in the city of Breaux Bridge is hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 7, line 17, after "Program for" delete the remainder of the line in its entirety
and delete line 18 in its entirety and at the beginning of line 19 delete "to Mills
Avenue in the city of Breaux Bridge" and insert "State Highway District 3 for asphalt
overlay and related work on LA 328 from LA 336-1 to LA 94, or other routes in St.
Martin Parish"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(D)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $88,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the town of Pearl River for dredging is hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 50, at the beginning of line 23, delete "to the town of Pearl River" and insert
"to St. Tammany Recreation District #5"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(E)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 07-276 Department of Transportation and Development for
$250,000 out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the Operations Program for asphalt
overlay and related work on Moody Dixon Road in Ascension Parish is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
On page 7, line 8, between "Program for" and "asphalt" insert "the Ascension Parish
Government for"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(F)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 07-276 Department of Transportation and Development for
$500,000 out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the Operations Program for the Manchac
Road asphalt overlay and related work and roundabout construction at the intersection of
Braud Road and Germany Road in Ascension Parish is hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
On page 7, line 12, between "Program for" and "the Manchac" insert "the Ascension
Parish Government for"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(G)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 776 of the 2024 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aide to Local Government Entities for
$1,000,000 out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the St. Helena Police Jury for
improvements to the Industrial Park for emergency purposes and recreation is hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 31, line 15, after "Jury for" delete the remainder of the line in its entirety
and delete line 16 in its entirety and at the beginning of line 17 delete "recreation"
and insert "acquisitions, equipment, supplies, and services for upgrades to and
construction of recreational infrastructure including baseball fields"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(H)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $200,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the Caddo Parish Commission for operating
expenses is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 70 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
On page 37, line 36, after "to the" delete the remainder of the line in its entirety and
at the beginning of line 37 delete "expenses" and insert "city of Shreveport for
infrastructure, beautification, and youth programming in Louisiana House of
Representatives District 3"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(I)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $25,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the East Feliciana Council on Aging, Inc. for
equipment is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 43, at the beginning of line 15, delete "equipment" and insert "operating
expenses"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(J)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 776 of the 2024 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aide to Local Government Entities for $30,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the town of Glenmora for a digital projector and
speakers is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 35, line 35, after "Glenmora for" delete the remainder of the line in its
entirety and at the beginning of line 36 delete "speakers" and insert "roof and
electrical repairs"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(K) The appropriation contained in Section 21 of Act 1 of the 2025 Regular Session of
the Legislature in Schedule 09-307 Office of the Secretary for $500,000 out of the State
General Fund (Direct) for a school-based tele-health pilot project in conjunction with Hazel
Health in Saint Tammany Parish is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 95, delete line 31 and insert "conjunction with Cartwheel Health Services
P.C. in St."
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(L)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $150,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to Fire District 3 in Lafourche Parish to purchase
equipment is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 78, line 30, after "purchase" delete "equipment" and insert "a fire truck"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(M)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 170 of the 2022 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $300,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the city of Franklin for the replacement of the
historic lamp posts on Northwest Boulevard is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
On page 44, line 5, after "Franklin for" delete the remainder of the line in its entirety
and on line 6, delete "historic lamp posts on Northwest Boulevard" and insert
"critical water infrastructure"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(N)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $100,000
Page 71 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the town of Independence for equipment purchases
and maintenance is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 74, at the end of line 20, delete "equipment" and at the beginning of line 21,
delete "purchases and maintenance" and insert "vehicles"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(O)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $100,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for police
equipment is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 80, line 29, delete "police equipment" and insert "vehicles"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
(P) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session of
the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $500,000 out
of the State General Fund (Direct) to the Finding Roots Museum for a lease purchase
agreement for a new building is hereby repealed in its entirety.
(Q)(1) The appropriation contained in Section 1 of Act 461 of the 2025 Regular Session
of the Legislature in Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities for $20,000
out of the State General Fund (Direct) to the town of Clinton for supplies is hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
On page 43, line 25, after "Clinton" delete "for supplies"
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the appropriation in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027.
Section 3.(A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each of the
appropriations in this Act is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30,
2027.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each of the appropriations
contained in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities
in Act Nos. 1 and 461 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature that has a valid
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2026, is deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreements, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(C)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, each of the appropriations contained in Other
Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act Nos. 4 and
776 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature that has a valid Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement in effect on June 30, 2026, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through
June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreements, including but
not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply to the following
appropriations:
(a) The $255,000 appropriation to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for improvements
to Ed Carroll Road.
(b) The $127,000 appropriation to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for improvements
to Firmin Road.
(D) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act 397
of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature for the city of Ruston for $6,000,000 for
infrastructure improvements which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June
30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all
provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the city of Ruston and the
Department of the Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall
be performed as agreed.
Page 72 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act 397
of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature for the St. Charles Parish Government for
$70,000 for the Odd Fellows Lodge #1342 which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through
June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the St.
Charles Parish Government and the Department of the Treasury, including but not limited
to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act 397
of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature for St. Charles Parish for $400,000 for two
24-inch water pumps which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026,
shall be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the St. Charles Parish and the Department
of the Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed
as agreed.
(G) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act 119 of the 2021
Regular Session of the Legislature for the St. Charles Parish Council for $750,000 for the
extension of Judge Edward Dufresne Parkway which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through
June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the St.
Charles Parish Council and the Department of the Treasury, including but not limited to the
reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(H) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act 4 of the 2024 Regular
Session of the Legislature for the city of Westwego for the WHARF project which has a
valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement between the city of Westwego and the Department of the Treasury, including but
not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(I) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature for the city of Westwego for the WHARF project which has a
valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement between the city of Westwego and the Department of the Treasury, including but
not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(J) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act 1 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature for the city of Westwego for the Creative Arts Center which has
a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement between the city of Westwego and the Department of the Treasury, including but
not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(K) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act 170
of the 2022 Regular Session of the Legislature for the St. Tammany Parish Government for
$500,000 for restoration expenses associated with the historic lodge at Camp Salmen which
has a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement between the St. Tammany Parish Government and the Department of the
Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(L) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act 397
of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature for the St. Tammany Parish Government for
$500,000 for Highway 22 improvements which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through
June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the St.
Page 73 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Tammany Parish Government and the Department of the Treasury, including but not limited
to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(M) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities
in Act 397 of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature for the St. Tammany Parish
Government for $150,000 for planning and construction of the University Square Learning
Center Facilities which has a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement on June 30, 2026, shall
be deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of
the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the St. Tammany Parish Government and the
Department of the Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall
be performed as agreed.
(N) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act No.
1 of the 2020 First Extraordinary Session of the Legislature to the Gentilly Development
District for $100,000 that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2021, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Gentilly Development District and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(O) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities in Act No.
45 of the 2020 Second Extraordinary Session of the Legislature to the Baton Rouge North
Economic Development District for $250,000 that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement in effect on June 30, 2026, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through
June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreements between the
Baton Rouge North Economic Development District and the Department of Treasury,
including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(P)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each of the appropriations
contained in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities
in Act Nos. 119 and 120 of the 2021 Regular Session of the Legislature that had a valid
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2022, is deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 119 of the 2021
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for Hope Haven Festival
Park Improvements that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2022, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish Council and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(Q)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each of the appropriations
contained in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities
in Act Nos. 170 and 199 of the 2022 Regular Session of the Legislature that had a valid
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2023, is deemed a bona fide
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 199 of the 2022
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for Hope Haven Festival
Park Improvements that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2023, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish Council and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(R)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each of the appropriations
contained in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-945 State Aid to Local Government Entities
in Act Nos. 397 and 447 of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature that has a valid
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2024, is deemed a bona fide
Page 74 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor
Agreements, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 447 of the 2023
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for Hope Haven Festival
Park Improvements that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2024, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish Council and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 447 of the 2023
Regular Session of the Legislature out of the Allen Parish Capital Improvements Fund for
$215,871 that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2024, is
deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Allen Parish Capital Improvement Board and
the Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall
be performed as agreed.
(S)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 4 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for Hope Haven Festival
Park Improvements that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2025, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish Council and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 4 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature out of the Allen Parish Capital Improvements Fund for
$215,871 that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2025, is
deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Allen Parish Capital Improvements Board
and the Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements,
shall be performed as agreed.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 4 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature out of the Shreveport Riverfront and Convention Center
and Independence Stadium Fund for $5,000 for the Poke Salad Festival in Shreveport that
had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2025, is deemed a bona
fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the Cooperative
Endeavor Agreement between the Poke Salad Festival in Shreveport and the Department of
Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as
agreed.
(T)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for Hope Haven Festival
Park Improvements that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30,
2026, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions
of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish Council and the
Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be
performed as agreed.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature to Jefferson Parish for the Allstate Sugar Bowl Basketball
Tournament that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in effect on June 30, 2026,
is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027, and all provisions of the
Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between Jefferson Parish and the Department of Treasury,
including but not limited to the reporting requirements, shall be performed as agreed.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any appropriation contained
in Other Requirements, Schedule 20-901 Sales Tax Dedications in Act No. 1 of the 2025
Page 75 of 76

HB NO. 312 ENROLLED
Regular Session of the Legislature to the Jefferson Parish Council for the New Growth
Economic Development Association that had a valid Cooperative Endeavor Agreement in
effect on June 30, 2026, is deemed a bona fide obligation of the state through June 30, 2027,
and all provisions of the Cooperative Endeavor Agreement between the Jefferson Parish
Council and the Department of Treasury, including but not limited to the reporting
requirements, shall be performed as agreed."
Section 4. The following revisions are hereby made to the referenced legislation for the
purpose of making supplemental capital outlay appropriations for Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
Provided, however, the provisions of Sections 2 through 19, inclusive, of Act No. 2 of the
2025 Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature are adopted and incorporated by reference
for the appropriations contained in this Section.
On page 20, between lines 19 and 20, insert the following:
"LA 86: LA 320 - LA 3242
LA 88 & 89: Vermilion P/L - US 90
LA 82: 0.9 MI E of N Island Rd - Vermilion P/L
LA 1: Atchafalaya River - Rosewood Crossing
LA 15: W. Feliciana P/L - L.M. 10.530
LA 1026: LA 16 - Forrest Delatte Rd
LA 39: Levee - 3850' N. of Harlen Lane"

On page 137, delete lines 17 through 22 in their entirety
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or,
if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without
signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this
Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 76 of 76